New Jersey, session 222, S205.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 18 of P.L.1999, c.356 (C.39:5G-1) is amended to read as follows: 18. a.  A person who shall own and operate a limousine in any street in this State in violation of the provisions of article 2 of chapter 16 of Title 48 of the Revised Statutes or of Title 39 of the Revised Statutes shall be subject to the following penalties: [a.] (1) [For] for operating a limousine without a license issued by a municipality pursuant to R.S.48:16-17, knowingly permitting a driver to operate a limousine without a validly issued driver's license or a validly issued commercial driver license if required pursuant to N.J.A.C.13:21-23.1, failure to have filed an insurance policy in the amount of $1,500,000 which is currently in force as provided in R.S.48:16-14 or in the amounts required pursuant to section 14 of P.L.1999, c.356 (C.48:16-22.4), operating a limousine in which the number of passengers exceeds the maximum seating capacity as provided in R.S.48:16-13 or section 2 of P.L.1997, c.356 (C.48:16-13.1):  a fine of $2,500 for the first offense [and] ; a fine of [$5000] $5,000 for the second [or subsequent] offense; and a fine of $7,500, the immediate suspension of the violators drivers license for a period of at least six months, and the immediate impoundment of the vehicle operated in violation of this paragraph for the third and any subsequent offense; (2)  [For] for operating a limousine without the special registration plates required pursuant to section 12 of P.L.1979, c.224 (C.39:3-19.5), or operating a limousine without the limousine being properly inspected as provided in R.S.39:8-1:  a fine of $1,250 for the first offense [and] ; a fine of $2,500 for the second [or subsequent] offense; and a fine of $7,500 and the immediate impoundment of the vehicle operated in violation of this paragraph for the third and any subsequent offense; (3)  [For] for operating a limousine without the attached sideboards required by section 11 of P.L.1999, c.356 (C.48:16-22.1), failure to retain within the limousine appropriate proof of insurance pursuant to R.S.48:16-17, or failure to execute and deliver to the chief administrator the power of attorney required pursuant to R.S.48:16-16:  a fine of $250 for the first offense; and a fine of $500 for the second and subsequent offense; and (4)  [For] for failure to be equipped with a two-way communications system, a removable first-aid kit, and an operable fire extinguisher, as required by section 11 of P.L.1999, c.356 (C.48:16-22.1), or any other violation of the provisions of article 2 of chapter 16 of Title 48 of the Revised Statutes other than those enumerated in this subsection:  a fine of $50 for the first offense; and a fine of $100 for the second and subsequent offense. b.    Violations of this section shall be enforced and penalties collected in a summary proceeding pursuant to the "Penalty Enforcement Law of 1999," P.L.1999, c.274 (C.2A:58-10 et seq.).  The Superior Court or any municipal court where the violation was detected, or where the defendant was apprehended, shall have jurisdiction to enforce this section.  Penalties imposed pursuant to this section shall be in addition to those otherwise imposed according to law.  All penalties collected pursuant to the provisions of this section shall be forwarded as provided in R.S.39:5-40 and subsection b. of R.S.39:5-41. c.    State Police officers may enter the property of the operator of a limousine service to conduct an inspection of documents and vehicles upon probable cause that the operator is violating R.S.48:16-14, R.S.48:16-17, R.S.48:16-22, section 11 of P.L.1999, c.356 (C.48:16-22.1), section 14 of P.L.1999, c.356 (C.48:16-22.4), or section 12 of P.L.1979, c.224 (C.39:3-19.5). (cf: P.L.2009, c.325, s.1) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.